apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="salb/re__n">
		<e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>rã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="salensaa/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sal/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="salu/ka__n">
		<e>       <p><l>k</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ka</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>kã</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>si</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãmb/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãmbol/go__n">
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>go</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>do</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>do</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>dã</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sam/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sam-dɩt/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãmog/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emba</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>emba</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>embã</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>embã</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãmpo/gre__n">
		<e>       <p><l>gr</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gre</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>grã</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ag</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aga</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>aga</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>agã</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>agã</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
<pardef n="sams/re__n">
		<e>       <p><l>r</l>          <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>re</l>          <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>rã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>       <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>       <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sam-/soaba__n">
		<e>       <p><l>soaba</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>soabã</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dãmb</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dãmba</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>dãmba</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dãmbã</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>dãmbã</l>     <r>soaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãnem baood/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãnem-p/ɛɛlga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ɛɛlga</l>         <r>ɛɛlga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ɛɛlgã</l>         <r>ɛɛlga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>eelse</l>        <r>ɛɛlga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>eels</l>        <r>ɛɛlga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>eelsã</l>        <r>ɛɛlga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ɛɛlg</l>        <r>ɛɛlga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="saood/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sãmb/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="salbre">          <i>salb</i><par n="salb/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="salensaaga">      <i>salensaa</i><par n="salensaa/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="salga">           <i>sal</i><par n="sal/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="saluka">          <i>salu</i><par n="salu/ka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmbga">          <i>sãmb</i><par n="sãmb/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmbolgo">        <i>sãmbol</i><par n="sãmbol/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="samde">           <i>sam</i><par n="sam/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sam-dɩta">        <i>sam-dɩt</i><par n="sam-dɩt/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmogo">          <i>sãmog</i><par n="sãmog/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmpogre">        <i>sãmpo</i><par n="sãmpo/gre__n"/></e>
	<e lm="samsre">          <i>sams</i><par n="sams/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sam-soaba">       <i>sam-</i><par n="sam-/soaba__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãnem baooda">    <i>sãnem baood</i><par n="sãnem baood/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãnem-pɛɛlga">    <i>sãnem-p</i><par n="sãnem-p/ɛɛlga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="saooda">          <i>saood</i><par n="saood/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="salbre">          <i>salb</i><par n="salb/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="salensaaga">      <i>salensaa</i><par n="salensaa/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="salga">           <i>sal</i><par n="sal/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="saluka">          <i>salu</i><par n="salu/ka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmbga">          <i>sãmb</i><par n="sãmb/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmbolgo">        <i>sãmbol</i><par n="sãmbol/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="samde">           <i>sam</i><par n="sam/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sam-dɩta">        <i>sam-dɩt</i><par n="sam-dɩt/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmogo">          <i>sãmog</i><par n="sãmog/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãmpogre">        <i>sãmpo</i><par n="sãmpo/gre__n"/></e>
	<e lm="samsre">          <i>sams</i><par n="sams/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sam-soaba">       <i>sam-</i><par n="sam-/soaba__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãnem baooda">    <i>sãnem baood</i><par n="sãnem baood/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sãnem-pɛɛlga">    <i>sãnem-p</i><par n="sãnem-p/ɛɛlga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="saooda">          <i>saood</i><par n="saood/a__n"/></e>
